Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.210

Scientific research.

The commission may fund, conduct, or otherwise participate in scientific research related to beef including, without limitation, to improve production, quality, transportation, processing, distribution, and environmental stewardship.

[ 2024 c 155 s 2.]